Georgia, session 2025_26, SB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
condominiums, is amended by revising Code Section 44-3-94, relating to damage or
destruction of units, as follows:
"44-3-94.
(a) Unless otherwise provided in the condominium instruments, in the event of damage to
or destruction of any unit by a casualty covered under insurance required to be maintained
by the association pursuant to Code Section 44-3-107, the association shall cause the unit
to be restored. Unless otherwise provided in the condominium instruments, any funds
required for such restoration in excess of the insurance proceeds attributable thereto shall
be paid by the unit owner of the unit; provided, however, that, in the event that the unit
- 1 -

LC 46 1174S
owner of the unit together with the unit owners of other units to which two-thirds of the
votes in the association pertain agree not to restore the unit, the unit shall not be restored
and the entire undivided interest in the common elements pertaining to that unit shall then
pertain to the remaining units, to be allocated to them in proportion to their undivided
interests in the common elements, and the remaining portion of that unit shall thenceforth
be a part of the common elements. Votes in the association and liability for future common
expenses shall thereupon pertain to the remaining units, being allocated to them in
proportion to their relative voting strength in the association and liability for common
expenses, respectively. To the extent provided for in the condominium instruments, the
association may allocate equitably the payment of a reasonable insurance deductible
between the association and the unit owners affected by a casualty against which the
association is required to insure; provided, however, that the amount of deductible which
can be allocated to any one unit owner shall not exceed $5,000.00 $25,000.00 per casualty
loss covered under any insurance required to be maintained by the association under this
article. The existence of a reasonable deductible in any required insurance policy shall not
be deemed a failure to maintain insurance as required by this Code section.
(b) Each association in this state shall timely notify all unit owners within such association
of any material change in such association's master policy deductible. Such notification
shall be in writing and accomplished by depositing the notice in the United States mail to
be dispatched by at least first class mail to the address of record of the unit owner. Such
notice may alternatively be delivered, with the unit owner's written consent, in person, or
through electronic transmittal or facsimile."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 2 -